Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 4. Two-Year College Transfer Grant Program.

§ 23.1-622.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Eligible institution”
means a baccalaureate public institution of higher education or baccalaureate nonprofit private institution of higher education whose primary purpose is to provide undergraduate collegiate education and not to provide religious training or theological education.

“Grant”
means the amount of financial assistance awarded under this article whether disbursed by warrant directly to an eligible institution or directly to a Virginia student.

“Program”
means the Two-Year College Transfer Grant Program.

History.

2007, cc. 850, 899, § 23-38.10:8; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-623.
Two-Year College Transfer Grant Program; Council regulations.

The Two-Year College Transfer Grant Program is created to provide financial assistance to eligible students, beginning with the first-time entering freshman class of the fall 2007 academic year, for the costs of attending an eligible institution. Funds may be paid to any eligible institution on behalf of students who have been awarded financial assistance pursuant to §

23.1-624

.

The Council shall adopt regulations for the implementation of the provisions of this article and the disbursement of funds consistent with the provisions of this article that are appropriate to the administration of the Program.

History.

2007, cc. 850, 899, § 23-38.10:9; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-624.
Eligibility criteria.

Grants shall be made under the Program to or on behalf of Virginia students who (i) maintained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent while enrolled in an associate degree program at an associate-degree-granting public institution of higher education, (ii) have received an associate degree at an associate-degree-granting public institution of higher education, (iii) have enrolled in an eligible institution by the fall or spring following the award of such associate degree, (iv) have applied for financial aid, and (v) have demonstrated financial need, defined as an Expected Family Contribution (EFC) of no more than $12,000 as calculated by the federal government using the family’s financial information reported on the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) form.

Eligibility for a grant under the Program is limited to three academic years. Grants under the Program shall be used only for undergraduate coursework in educational programs other than those providing religious training or theological education.

To remain eligible for a grant under the Program, a student shall continue to demonstrate financial need as defined in subsection A, maintain a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a scale of 4.0 or its equivalent, and make satisfactory academic progress toward a degree.

Individuals who have failed to meet the federal requirement to register for the Selective Service are not eligible to receive grants pursuant to this article. However, an individual who has failed to register for the Selective Service shall not be denied a right, privilege, or benefit under this section if (i) the requirement to so register has terminated or become inapplicable to the individual and (ii) the individual shows by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure to register was not a knowing and willful failure to register.

History.

2007, cc. 850, 899, § 23-38.10:10; 2014, c. 806; 2016, c. 588; 2017, cc. 102, 297.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 102 and 297 are identical, and substituted “$12,000” for “8,000” in clause (v) of subsection A.

§ 23.1-625.
Amount of award.

The amount of the grant for an eligible student shall be provided in accordance with the general appropriation act and shall be fixed at $1,000 per academic year. An additional $1,000 per academic year shall be provided to eligible students pursuing undergraduate coursework in engineering, mathematics, nursing, teaching, or science.

History.

2007, cc. 850, 899, § 23-38.10:11; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-626.
Determination of domicile.

For the purposes of determining a student’s eligibility for a grant, the enrolling institution shall determine domicile as provided in §

23.1-502

and the Council’s domicile guidelines.

History.

2007, cc. 850, 899, § 23-38.10:12; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-627.
State financial aid eligibility.

Eligible institutions shall reduce a student’s state financial aid eligibility by the amount of the grant awarded pursuant to this article.

Grants shall not be reduced by virtue of an eligible student’s receipt of any other financial aid from any other source except when the total of the grant and such other financial aid would enable the student to receive total financial assistance in excess of the estimated cost to the student of attending the institution in which he is enrolled.

History.

2007, cc. 850, 899, § 23-38.10:13; 2016, c. 588.